turku-src/affixes/nouns.lexc
!Nouns

LEXICON N
+N+Nom:0 AfterN ;

LEXICON N-ae
+N+Nom:0 AfterN-ae ;


LEXICON N-VS
N-Vs ;

LEXICON N-Vs
+N+Nom:0 AfterN-Vs ;
+N+Ill:0 WordEnd ; !Cont. to WordEnd because the abbreviated form probably cannot occur
                   !in the middle of the form; cont. to enclitics could be added if necessary.

!LEXICON NUnprod
!+N: AfterNUnprod ;

!LEXICON NUndecl  
!+N: AfterNUndecl ;





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!! (6) BRANCHING INTO THE SUFFIX LEXICONS !!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 

LEXICON AfterN 
  Cx-Gen ; Cx-Acc ; Cx-Com ;  Cx-Ill ; Cx-Ine ; Cx-Lat-e ; Cx-Dat ; Cx-Mod ;  
  Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ;
  Pl-sh_w ;  Pl-la ;  Pl-myt ;
  Cmp ; !the rak ending must later be restricted to adjectives
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ;  Enc-laj ; Enc-s ; Enc-ys ; !makes the encl. (-)(y)s probably 
                                                                               !overproductive
  WordEnd ;

LEXICON AfterN-ae
  Cx-Gen ; Cx-Acc ; Cx-Com ; Cx-Ill ; Cx-Ine ; Cx-Lat-NOe ; Cx-Dat ; Cx-Mod ;  
  Px-Sg12-NOe ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ;
  Pl-sh_w ;  Pl-la ;  Pl-myt ;
  Cmp ; !the rak ending must later be restricted to adjectives
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ; Enc-laj ; Enc-s ; Enc-ys ; !makes the encl. (-)(y)s probably 
                                                                              !overproductive
   WordEnd ; 

LEXICON AfterN-Vs
  Cx-Gen ; Cx-Acc ; Cx-Com ; Cx-Ill ; Cx-Ine ; Cx-IllIne-NOsh ;  Cx-Lat-e ;  Cx-Dat ; Cx-Mod ;  
  Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ;  Px-Sg3-zh ; Px-Pl ;
  Pl-sh_w ;  Pl-la ;  Pl-myt ;
  Cmp ; !the rak ending must later be restricted to adjectives
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ; Enc-laj ; Enc-s ; Enc-ys ; !makes the encl. (-)(y)s probably 
                                                                              !overproductive
  WordEnd ; 
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
 LEXICON AfterCx-End  
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ; Enc-laj ; !Ac1amyn-laj
  WordEnd ; 

LEXICON AfterCx-Px  
  Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ; Px-Pl ; 
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ; Enc-laj ; !other enclitics to be added when encountered
  WordEnd ; 

LEXICON AfterCx-aPx  
  Px-Sg12-NOe ; Px-Sg3-zhe ;  Px-Pl ;
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ; Enc-laj ; !other enclitics to be added when encountered
  WordEnd ; 

LEXICON AfterCx-Lat  
  Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-yzhe ; Px-Pl ; 
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ; Enc-laj ;  !other enclitics to be added when encountered
  WordEnd ; 
 !----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
LEXICON AfterPx 
  Cx-Gen ; Cx-Acc ; Cx-Com ; Cx-Dat ; Cx-Mod ;
  Pl-sh_w ;  !Pl-la not included because of the dominant Pl-Px order. Perhaps    Pl-myt 
           !should be added later if there appears Px-PlmYt forms.
  Vx-GerSim-la ;
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ;  Enc-la ;  Enc-laj ; Enc-mozho ; Enc-mochet ;   !other enclitics to be added 
                                                                                !when encountered
  WordEnd ;
 
LEXICON AfterPx-zh 
  Cx-Com ; Cx-Dat ; Cx-Mod ;
  Vx-GerSim-la ;
  WordEnd ; 
!-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
!The continuations of the plurals are constructed so that vlak and samych take
!after them anything that a normal word does, whereas la takes only local cases
! and myt takes other cases than local.
LEXICON AfterPl-la 
  Cx-Ill ; Cx-Ine ; Cx-Lat-NOe ;  !Other cases must be added if found in texts
  Px-Sg12-NOe ; Px-Sg3-zhe ;  Px-Pl ;
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ; Enc-laj ;  !other enclitics to be added when encountered
  WordEnd ; 

LEXICON AfterPl-myt 
  Cx-Gen ; Cx-Acc ; Cx-Com ;  Cx-Dat ; Cx-Mod ;  !Local cases must be added if found in texts
  Px-Sg12-e ; Px-Sg3-zhe ;  Px-Pl ;
  Enc-ak ; Enc-at ; Enc-la ; Enc-laj ; 
  WordEnd ;
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
LEXICON AfterCmp  !Based on the distribution in Onchyko corpus
  Cx-Gen ; 
  Cx-Acc ; 
  Cx-Dat ; 
  Cx-Mod ;
  Px-Sg12-e ; 
  Px-Sg3-zhe ; 
  Px-Pl ;
  Pl-sh_w ;
  Enc-ak ; 
  Enc-at ;  
  Enc-la ; 
  Enc-laj ;
  WordEnd ; 



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!! (7) LEXICONS CONTAINING THE SUFFIXES !!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!Huom! Kaikkien suffiksien eteen pitää panna 
!!!junktuurisymboli $, jotta morfofonologiset 
!!!säännöt toimisivat oikein.

!Nouns

!The flag diacritics @U.PX... can be removed by placing Comitative in a 
!separate lexicon and adjusting the continuation class in the second line
!of lexicon Px-Sg3.
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON Cx-Gen 
< "+Gen":[%$ VEP н]  >  AfterCx-End;  !no pxs after this

LEXICON Cx-Acc  
< "+Acc":[%$ VEP м]  >  AfterCx-End;  !no pxs after this 

LEXICON Cx-Com
< "+Com":[%$ г е]  >  AfterCx-End; !This lexicon is needed because of
                                                    !the shorter variant of the PxSg3
                                                    !which is attached to Dat, Mod,Com.

LEXICON Cx-Ill   !Ill and Ine divided into two lexicons because only Ill
                              !can come after -SaS participe
< "+Ill":[%$ VEP ш к %^E]  >  AfterCx-Px;  !normal pxs 
< "+Ill":[%$ VEP ш]  >  AfterCx-End; !Used only without Px 

LEXICON Cx-Ine
< "+Ine":[%$ VEP ш т %^E]  >  AfterCx-Px;

LEXICON Cx-IllIne-NOsh
< "+Ill":[%$ к %^E]  > AfterCx-Px; 
< "+Ine":[%$ т %^E]  > AfterCx-Px; 

LEXICON Cx-Lat-NOe
< "+Lat":[%$ ш]  > AfterCx-Lat ; !*muneSSe type  prevented 

LEXICON Cx-Lat-e
< "+Lat":[%$ е ш]  > AfterCx-Lat;

LEXICON Cx-Dat
< "+Dat":[%$ л а н]  > AfterCx-Px;

LEXICON Cx-Mod
< "+Mod":[%$ л а]  "@D.GERSIM.BEG@" > AfterCx-aPx; !Pxs that come 
                                                     !after strong a/e
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON Px-Sg12-e
+PxSg1:$ем AfterPx ;
< "+PxSg1+Acc":[%$ е м]  "@D.VERB.PRESENT@" > AfterPx ;
< "+PxSg2":[%$ е т]  "@P.PXSG2.PRESENT@" > AfterPx ;

LEXICON Px-Sg12-NOe
+PxSg1:$м AfterPx ;
+PxSg1+Acc:$м AfterPx ;
< "+PxSg2":[%$ т]  "@P.PXSG2.PRESENT@" > AfterPx ;

LEXICON Px-Sg3-zhe
< "+PxSg3":[%$ VEP ж %^E]  "@P.PXSG3.PRESENT@" > AfterPx ; 

LEXICON Px-Sg3-zh
< "+PxSg3":[%$ VEP ж]  > AfterPx-zh ;  !only in certain cases

LEXICON Px-Sg3-yzhe    !This lexicon is for the latives, to expel the 
                                   !*muneSSe type
< "+PxSg3":[%$ ы ж %^E]  "@P.PXSG3.PRESENT@" > AfterPx ; 

LEXICON Px-Pl
+PxPl1:$на AfterPx ;
+PxPl2:$да AfterPx ;
+PxPl3:$VEPшт AfterPx ;
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON Pl-sh_w  !shamych and wlak plurals are treated (almost) like normal words
< "+Pls":[%$ %- ш а м ы ч]  "@P.PL.PRESENT@" > AfterN ;
< "+Plw":[%$ %- в л а к]  "@P.PL.PRESENT@" > AfterN ;

LEXICON Pl-la
+Pll:$ла AfterPl-la ; !pitää laittaa kontinuaatio pxeihin, sillä PlPx tässä 
                                !dominoiva, 
                               !ks. väikkäri s. 125

LEXICON Pl-myt
+Plm:$мыт AfterPl-myt ; 
